Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.185

Referendum prior to termination of a marketing order or agreement—Procedure—Exceptions.

Except as provided in RCW 15.65.190 or subsection (4) of this section, the director, prior to termination of the marketing order or agreement, shall conduct a referendum as provided in this chapter, the rules adopted by the director, and the applicable marketing order or agreement.

(1) If a referendum on the termination of a marketing order or agreement is assented to, the referendum proposal shall be adopted by the director within thirty days of the count of the ballots and shall go into effect under chapter 34.05 RCW. If those affected producers eligible to vote in the referendum do not assent, no further action shall be taken by the director on the proposal.

(2) The list of affected producers used for conducting a referendum on the termination of a marketing order or agreement shall be kept in the rule-making file by the director. The list shall be certified as a true representation of the referendum mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer does not invalidate a referendum.

(3) The list of affected producers that is certified as the true representation of the mailing list of a referendum shall be used to determine assent as provided for in RCW 15.65.190.

(4) If the director determines that one hundred percent of the affected producers have filed a written application with the director requesting that a marketing order or agreement be terminated, the director may terminate the marketing order or agreement without conducting a referendum. The termination of the marketing order or agreement shall go into effect under chapter 34.05 RCW, but no sooner than at the end of the marketing season then current.

[ 2002 c 313 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.